Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.220

Eminent domain.

The board of directors of any school district may proceed to condemn and appropriate not more than fifteen acres of land for any elementary school purpose; not more than twenty-five acres for any junior high school purpose; not more than forty acres for any senior high school purpose; except as otherwise provided by law, not more than seventy-five acres for any vocational technical school purpose; and not more than fifteen acres for any other school district purpose. Such condemnation proceedings shall be in accordance with chapters 8.16 and 8.25 RCW and such other laws of this state providing for appropriating private property for public use by school districts.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.070. Prior: 1963 c 41 s 1; 1957 c 155 s 1; 1949 c 54 s 1; 1909 c 97 p 289 s 13; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4788. Formerly RCW 28A.58.070, 28.58.070.]